Maryland, session 2025, HB0585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
8–105.
(a) (1) Except for land that is actively devoted to farm or agricultural use, the
supervisor:
(i) may value income producing real property by using the
capitalization of income method or any other appropriate method of valuing the real
property; and
(ii) shall consider an income method in valuing income producing
commercial real property.
(2) For income producing single–family residential real property, the
supervisor may value the property by using the same methods that are used for
single–family residential real property that is owner–occupied.
(3) (I) In determining the value of commercial real property developed
under § 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, the supervisor SHALL EVALUATE EACH OF THE
FOLLOWING:
– 1 –

Ch. 67 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(i)] 1. [shall consider] the impact of applicable rent restrictions,
affordability requirements, or any other related restrictions required by § 42 of the Internal
Revenue Code and any other federal, State, or local programs;
[(ii)] 2. [may not consider income tax credits under § 42 of the
Internal Revenue Code as income attributable to the real property; and
(iii) 3. may consider] the replacement cost approach only if the
value produced by the replacement cost approach is less than the value produced by the
income approach for the property and it is reflective of the value of the real property; AND
3. THE ACTUAL OR ANTICIPATED NET OPERATING
INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE REAL PROPERTY, CAPITALIZED AT THE PREVAILING
MARKET RATE FOR CONVENTIONAL MULTIFAMILY PROPERTIES IN THE SAME
GEOGRAPHIC AREA, UPWARD ADJUSTED BETWEEN 1.5% AND 2% TO ACCOUNT FOR
AFFORDABILITY RESTRICTIONS AND OTHER ENCUMBRANCES REQUIRED UNDER §
42 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(II) IN DETERMINING THE VALUE OF COMMERCIAL REAL
PROPERTY DEVELOPED UNDER § 42 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, THE
SUPERVISOR MAY NOT CONSIDER INCOME TAX CREDITS UNDER § 42 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AS INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE REAL PROPERTY.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS OF CLOSING AND THE EXECUTION AND
DELIVERY OF THE REGULATORY AGREEMENT GOVERNING A LOW–INCOME HOUSING
TAX CREDIT FOR COMMERCIAL REAL PROPERTY DEVELOPED UNDER § 42 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT THAT A PROPERTY HAS BEEN
AWARDED THE LOW–INCOME HOUSING TAX CREDIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –